Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1525.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 36-2903.05, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE36-2903.05. Uniform application and eligibility process A. The director shall adopt rules to prescribe a uniform application and eligibility process for participants in the premium sharing program, the children's health insurance program and healthcare group. B. The administration shall coordinate application screening for the programs prescribed in subsection A and facilitate the transfer of a member from one program to another program for which the member qualifies.END_STATUTE